Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Chapter 63. Digital Signature Act [Repealed]

§§ 25-63-1 through 25-63-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2001, ch. 400, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§25-63-1. [Laws, 1997, ch. 329, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§25-63-3. [Laws, 1997, ch. 329, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§25-63-5. [Laws, 1997, ch. 329, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§25-63-7. [Laws, 1997, ch. 329, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§25-63-9. [Laws, 1997, ch. 329, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§25-63-11. [Laws, 1997, ch. 329, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]